Massachusetts, session 194th, H3918.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of chapter 51 of the General
Laws or any other general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any individual aged
16 or 17 years old residing in the City of Somerville, who is ineligible to vote due to age under
state law, but who is otherwise eligible to vote under state law, may upon application have their
names entered on a list of voters established by the board of election commissioners for the City
of Somerville. Such individuals on the list of voters may vote in any election for local offices and
local ballot questions in accordance with this Act. For the purposes of this Act, "local voters" are
anyone who is eligible to vote pursuant to this Act in a local election or upon a local ballot
question in the City of Somerville.
of 2

SECTION 2. Said board of election commissioners shall establish a separate registration
list for local voters who shall fill out an alternative registration form. Upon turning eighteen,
each local voter shall be taken off the separate list and notified that he or she must register as a
regular voter in accordance with state law, regulations, and guidelines, in order to be eligible to
vote. Said board shall create and print, at the city of Somerville's expense, the special registration
form needed for the purpose of registering local voters.
SECTION 3. Said board is hereby authorized to promulgate regulations, guidelines and
forms to implement the purpose of this act.
SECTION 4. If a local ballot question appears on a state election ballot, the board shall
print a separate ballot for the local ballot question at the expense of the City of Somerville.
SECTION 5. The City of Somerville is hereby authorized to pass ordinances to
implement the purpose of this act subject to all the provisions of the Somerville city charter.
SECTION 6. Nothing in this act shall be construed to confer upon local voters the right to
vote for any state or federal office or any state or federal ballot questions.
of 2